Illinois, session 104th, SB3647.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Alexander/Pulaski Medical District Act. 6    Section 5. Creation of District; purpose. The 7Alexander/Pulaski Medical District is created within Alexander 8County and Pulaski County as follows:9        (1) South boundary: the Mississippi River.10        (2) East boundary: the Ohio River.11        (3) North boundary: Modglin Road in Pulaski County in 12    a line directly west to Illinois Route 127 and Modglin 13    Road in a line directly east to the county line.14        (4) West boundary: Interstate 57 from the Mississippi 15    River to Illinois Route 3, and then Illinois Route 3 to 16    Olive Branch Road, and then Illinois Route 127 to the 17    north boundary line.18    The District is created to attract and retain academic 19centers of excellence, viable health care facilities, medical 20research facilities, emerging high-technology enterprises, and 21other facilities and uses as permitted by this Act.  22    Section 10. The Alexander/Pulaski Medical District   SB3647- 2 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1Commission. 2    (a) The Alexander/Pulaski Medical District Commission is 3created. The Commission's general purpose, in addition to 4those other purposes and powers set forth in this Act, is to: 5        (1) maintain the proper surroundings for a medical 6    center and a related technology center in order to 7    attract, stabilize, and retain within the District 8    hospitals, clinics, research facilities, educational 9    facilities, or other facilities permitted under this Act; 10    and 11        (2) provide for the orderly creation, maintenance, 12    development, and expansion of (i) health care facilities 13    and other ancillary or related facilities that the 14    Commission determines are established and operated (A) for 15    any aspect of the carrying out of the Commission's 16    purposes as set forth in this Act, (B) for the study, 17    diagnosis, and treatment of human ailments and injuries, 18    whether physical or mental, or (C) to promote medical, 19    surgical, and scientific research and knowledge as 20    permitted under this Act, and (ii) medical research and 21    high-technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 22    buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 23    for those parks. 24    (b) The Commission has perpetual succession and the power 25to contract and be contracted with, to sue and, except in tort 26actions, to be sued, to plead and be impleaded, to have and use   SB3647- 3 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1a common seal, and to alter the common seal. All tort actions 2against the Commission shall be prosecuted in the Court of 3Claims. The principal office of the Commission shall be 4located at a hospital operated within the District. The 5Commission may hire or contract with any personnel as the 6Commission deems advisable to carry out the purposes of this 7Act and the work of the Commission. 8    (c) The Commission shall consist of 12 appointed 9commissioners and 3 ex officio commissioners. Of the 10commissioners appointed, 3 shall be appointed by the Governor, 113 shall be appointed by the Mayor of Cairo, 3 shall be 12appointed by the Alexander County Board Chairperson, and 3 13shall be appointed by the Pulaski County Board Chairperson. 14All appointed commissioners shall hold office for a 3-year 15term ending on December 31 until their successors are 16appointed and have qualified; except that, of the initial 17appointed commissioners, the Governor, Mayor, and county 18chairpersons shall each appoint one appointee for a term 19ending December 31, 2027, shall each appoint one appointee for 20a term ending December 31, 2028, and shall each appoint one 21appointee for a term ending December 31, 2029. The Director of 22Commerce and Economic Opportunity or his or her designee, the 23Director of Public Health or his or her designee, and the 24Secretary of Human Services or his or her designee shall serve 25as ex officio commissioners.26    (d) Any vacancy in the office of an appointed commissioner   SB3647- 4 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1occurring by reason of the death, resignation, 2disqualification, removal, or inability or refusal to act by 3the commissioner shall be filled by the authority that 4appointed the commissioner for the unexpired term of office of 5that commissioner. 6    (e) The Commission shall hold regular meetings annually 7for the election of a president, vice president, secretary, 8and treasurer, for the adoption of a budget, and for any other 9business that may properly come before it. The Commission 10shall establish the duties and responsibilities of its 11officers by rule. The president or any 3 commissioners of the 12Commission may call special meetings of the Commission. Each 13commissioner shall take an oath of office for the faithful 14performance of his or her duties. The Commission may not 15transact business at a meeting of the Commission unless there 16is present at the meeting a quorum consisting of at least 9 17commissioners. Meetings may be held by telephone conference or 18other communications equipment by means of which all persons 19participating in the meeting can communicate with each other. 20    (f) The Commission shall submit to the General Assembly, 21not later than March 1 of each even-numbered year, a detailed 22report covering its operations for the 2 preceding calendar 23years and a statement of its program for the next 2 years.24    (g) Neither the Commission nor the District has any power 25to tax. 26    (h) The Commission is a public body and is subject to the   SB3647- 5 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1Open Meetings Act and the Freedom of Information Act.  2    Section 15. Grants; loans; appropriations; contracts. The 3Commission may apply for and accept grants, loans, or 4appropriations from the State of Illinois, the federal 5government, a state or federal agency or instrumentality, a 6unit of local government, or any other person or entity to be 7used for any of the purposes of the District. The Commission 8may enter into any agreement with the State of Illinois, the 9federal government, a state or federal instrumentality, a unit 10of local government, or any other person or entity in relation 11to the grants, matching grants, loans, or appropriations. 12    The Commission may, by contract, accept and collect from 13entities that enter into the contract assessments or fees for 14District enhancements and improvements, common area shared 15services, shared facilities, or other activities or 16expenditures in furtherance of the purposes of this Act. 17    The Commission may make grants to neighborhood 18organizations within the District for the purpose of 19benefiting the District.  20    Section 20. Property; acquisition. The Commission may 21acquire the fee simple title to real property lying within the 22District and personal property required for its purposes, by 23gift, purchase, or otherwise. Title shall be taken in the 24corporate name of the Commission. The Commission may lease any   SB3647- 6 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1real property located within the District and personal 2property found by the Commission to be necessary for its 3purposes and to which the Commission finds that it need not 4acquire the fee simple title for carrying out those purposes. 5    The Commission may acquire in its corporate name, under 6the provisions for the exercise of the right of eminent domain 7under the Eminent Domain Act, all real and personal property 8within the District, except for (i) property owned and used 9for purposes authorized under this Act by medical institutions 10or allied educational institutions, hospitals, dispensaries, 11clinics, dormitories or homes for the nurses, doctors, 12students, instructors, or other officers or employees of those 13institutions located in the District, (ii) real property that 14is used for offices or for recreational purposes in connection 15with the institutions listed in (i), or (iii) any improved 16residential property within a historical district properly 17designated under a federal statute or a State or local statute 18that has been certified by the Secretary of the Interior of the 19United States to the Secretary of the Treasury of the United 20States as containing criteria that will substantially achieve 21the purpose of preserving and rehabilitating buildings of 22historical significance to the District. 23    The Commission has no quick-take powers, no zoning powers, 24and no power to establish or enforce building codes. The 25Commission may not acquire any property pursuant to this 26Section before a comprehensive master plan has been approved   SB3647- 7 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1under Section 60. Property owned by and exclusively used by 2the Commission is exempt from taxation.  3    Section 25. Construction and improvements. 4    (a) The Commission may, within the District and in its 5corporate capacity, construct or make improvements to, or 6cause to be constructed or improved, a hospital, sanitarium, 7clinic, laboratory, or any other institution, building, 8structure, or ancillary or related facility that the 9Commission determines should be established and operated for 10any one or more of the following purposes: 11        (1) carrying out of any aspect of the Commission's 12    purposes as set forth in this Act;13        (2) studying, diagnosing, and treating human ailments 14    and injuries, whether physical or mental, or promoting 15    medical, surgical, and scientific research and knowledge;16        (3) supporting and nurturing facilities and uses 17    permitted by this Act;18        (4) providing a nursing facility, extended care 19    facility, or other facilities that the Commission finds 20    useful in the study of, research in, or treatment of 21    illnesses or infirmities specific to the elderly; 22        (5) providing institutions that engage in the 23    training, education, or rehabilitation of persons with a 24    disability, as that term is defined in Section 10 of the 25    Disabilities Services Act of 2003;   SB3647- 8 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1        (6) providing office buildings for physicians or 2    dealers in medical accessories; 3        (7) providing dormitories, homes, or residences for 4    the medical profession, including interns, nurses, 5    students, or other officers or employees of the 6    institutions within the District, or for the use of 7    relatives of patients in the hospitals or other 8    institutions within the District; 9        (8) rehabilitating or establishing of residential 10    structures within a historic district properly designated 11    under a federal statute or a State or local statute that 12    has been certified by the Secretary of the Interior of the 13    United States to the Secretary of the Treasury of the 14    United States as containing criteria that will 15    substantially achieve the purpose of preserving and 16    rehabilitating buildings of historic significance to the 17    District, or any other areas of the District as the 18    Commission may designate; 19        (9) facilitating research, development, and 20    production, in any of the fields of medicine, chemistry, 21    pharmaceuticals, or physics, of genetically engineered 22    products; 23        (10) providing biotechnology, information technology, 24    medical technology, or environmental technology; and 25        (11) researching and developing engineering or 26    computer technology related to the medical field.  SB3647- 9 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1    The Commission may construct or improve, or cause to be 2constructed or improved, these institutions, buildings, 3structures, or ancillary or related facilities after a public 4hearing is held by any commissioner or other person authorized 5by the Commission to conduct the hearing.6    (b) The Illinois Procurement Code applies to any 7construction or improvements undertaken pursuant to this 8Section, and the Commission shall conduct all procurements in 9a manner that is consistent with that Code. Construction or 10improvement may not be undertaken pursuant to this Section 11before a comprehensive master plan has been approved by the 12Commission under Section 60.  13    Section 30. Relocation assistance. The Commission may 14provide relocation assistance to persons and entities 15displaced by the Commission's acquisition of property and 16improvement of the District. Relocation assistance shall not 17be less than would be provided by the federal government to a 18displaced person under the federal Uniform Relocation 19Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 20and the regulations promulgated under that Act. As used in 21this Section, "displaced person" has the meaning ascribed to 22that term in 42 U.S.C. 4601. Relocation assistance may include 23assistance with the moving of a residential unit to a new 24location. The Commission shall identify an individual to serve 25as a single point of contact for information about relocation   SB3647- 10 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1assistance provided under this Section.  2    Section 35. Disposition of Property. 3    (a) The Commission may sell, convey, or lease, all at fair 4market value, any title or interest in real property owned by 5it to any person or persons to be used, subject to the 6restrictions of this Act, for the purposes stated in this Act, 7for the purpose of serving persons using the facilities 8offered within the District, or for carrying out of any aspect 9of the Commission's purposes under Section 10, subject to the 10restrictions on the use of the real property as the Commission 11determines will carry out the purpose of this Act. To ensure 12that real property sold, conveyed, or leased under this 13subsection is used in accordance with this Act, the Commission 14shall inquire into and satisfy itself concerning the financial 15ability of the purchaser, conveyee, or lessee to complete the 16project for which the real property is sold, conveyed, or 17leased in accordance with a written plan to be submitted by the 18purchaser, conveyee, or lessee to the Commission. Under the 19plan, the purchaser, conveyee, or lessee shall promise (i) to 20use the land for the purposes designated in the presented 21plan, (ii) to commence and complete the construction of the 22buildings or other structures to be included in the project 23within the periods of time that the Commission determines, and 24(iii) to comply with any other conditions that the Commission 25determines are necessary to carry out the project.   SB3647- 11 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1    All sales, conveyances, and leases authorized in this 2subsection shall be made on the condition that, if used other 3than for the purposes prescribed in this Act, or unused for a 4period of at least one year, title to the property reverts to 5the Commission. All sales, conveyances, and leases made by the 6Commission to any person for use by residents or any other 7person shall be on the condition that if the resident or other 8person violates any of the restrictions as to the use of the 9property as the Commission has determined will carry out the 10purposes of this Act, then title to the property reverts to the 11Commission. If, however, the Commission finds that financing 12necessary for the acquisition or lease of any real estate or 13for the construction of any building or improvement to be used 14for purposes prescribed in this Act cannot be obtained if 15title to the land, building, or improvement is subject to such 16a reverter provision, the finding shall be made by the 17Commission after a public hearing is held. Upon the finding 18being made, the Commission may cause the real property to be 19conveyed free of a reverter provision if at least 9 20commissioners vote in favor of the sale, conveyance, or lease 21without the reverter provision. The Commission may also 22include, in the sales agreement, conveyance, lease agreement, 23or other documentation, provisions for notice of the 24violations or default and how to cure violations or default 25for the benefit of any lender or mortgagee as the Commission 26may determine is appropriate.   SB3647- 12 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1    If, at a regularly scheduled meeting, the Commission 2resolves that a parcel of real estate conveyed or leased by it, 3or in which it has sold the fee simple title or any lesser 4estate, is not being used for the purposes prescribed in this 5Act or has been unused for a period of at least one year, the 6Commission may file a lawsuit in the circuit court of either 7Alexander or Pulaski County to enforce the terms of the sale, 8conveyance, or lease. If a reverter of title to any property is 9ordered by the court under the terms of this Act, the interest 10of the Commission shall be subject to any then existing, valid 11mortgage or trust deed in the nature of a mortgage, but if the 12title is acquired through foreclosure of that mortgage or 13trust deed or by deed in lieu of foreclosure of that mortgage 14or trust deed, then the title to the property shall not revert, 15but shall be subject to the restrictions as to use, but not any 16penalty for nonuse, contained in this Act with respect to any 17mortgagee in possession or its successor or assigns.18    (b) If, at a regularly scheduled meeting, the Commission 19resolves that a parcel of real estate that is owned by the 20Commission is no longer needed for District purposes, the 21Commission may authorize the sale or public auction of the 22parcel. The resolution shall direct the sale to be conducted 23by (i) the staff of the Commission, (ii) listing with local 24licensed real estate agencies, in which case the terms of the 25agent's compensation shall be included in the resolution, 26(iii) or public auction. The resolution shall be published at   SB3647- 13 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1the first opportunity following its passage in a newspaper 2published in the District or, if none, then in a newspaper 3published in the county where the District is located. The 4resolution shall also contain pertinent information concerning 5the size, use, and zoning of the parcel and the terms of sale.6    (c) The Commission may not sell, convey, or lease any 7property pursuant to this Section before a comprehensive 8master plan has been approved under Section 60.  9    Section 40. Notice. Before holding a public hearing 10required under Section 35 or a meeting regarding the passage 11of a resolution to file a lawsuit, the Commission shall give 12notice to the grantee or lessee, or his or her legal 13representatives, successors, or assigns, of the time and place 14of the proceeding. The notice shall be accompanied by a 15statement signed by the secretary of the Commission, or by any 16person authorized by the Commission to sign the statement, 17setting forth any act or things done or omitted to be done in 18violation, or claimed to be in violation, of any restriction 19on the use of the property, whether the restriction is 20prescribed in any of the terms of this Act or by any 21restriction on the use of the property determined by the 22Commission under the terms of this Act. The notice of the time 23and place fixed for the proceeding shall also be given to any 24person as the Commission deems necessary. The notice may be 25given by registered mail, addressed to the grantee, lessee, or   SB3647- 14 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1legal representatives, successors, or assigns, at the last 2known address of the grantee, lessee, or legal 3representatives, successors, or assigns.  4    Section 45. Rules. The Commission may adopt rules, 5pursuant to the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 6regarding the exercise of its powers, governing its 7proceedings, and regulating all hearings held by it or at its 8direction, and it may also amend those rules.  9    Section 50. Official documents. Copies of all official 10documents, findings, and orders of the Commission, certified 11by a commissioner or by the secretary of the Commission to be 12true copies of the originals, under the official seal of the 13Commission, shall be evidence as if those copies were the 14originals.  15    Section 55. Judicial review. A party may obtain a judicial 16review of a final order or decision of the Commission in the 17circuit court of either Alexander or Pulaski County only in 18accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Review 19Law and the rules adopted under that Law. The circuit court 20shall take judicial notice of all the rules of practice and 21procedure of the Commission.  22    Section 60. Master plan; improvement and management of the   SB3647- 15 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1District. The Commission shall prepare and approve a 2comprehensive master plan under this Section for the orderly 3development and management of all property within the 4District. The master plan, and any amendment to the master 5plan, shall not take effect, however, until it has been 6approved by the Commission. The Commission shall take the 7actions permitted to be taken by it under this Act as it may 8determine are appropriate to provide conditions most favorable 9for the special care and treatment of the sick and injured, for 10the study of disease, and for any other purpose set forth in 11this Act. In the master plan, the Commission may provide for 12shared services and facilities within the District for the 13accredited schools of medicine and the licensed nonprofit 14acute care hospitals within the District.  15    Section 65. Public hearings. The Commission shall conduct 16a public hearing before taking any of the actions described in 17Section 25, making specified reverter-related findings under 18Section 35, or approving a comprehensive master plan under 19Section 60. The Commission shall also conduct a public hearing 20whenever it is otherwise required by law to do so and may 21conduct a public hearing whenever it may elect to do so. If 22there is no law governing a specific type of public hearing, 23the Commission shall conduct that public hearing pursuant to 24the Open Meetings Act and this Section.25    The Commission may authorize a commissioner or other   SB3647- 16 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1person of legal age to conduct a hearing not otherwise 2required by law. The commissioner or other authorized person 3may (i) administer oaths and affirmations, (ii) take the 4testimony of witnesses, (iii) take and receive the production 5of papers, books, records, accounts, and documents, (iv) 6receive pertinent evidence, and (v) certify the record of the 7hearing. The record of the hearing shall become part of the 8Commission's record. Notice of the time, place, and purpose of 9the hearing shall be given by a single publication notice in a 10secular newspaper or newspapers of general circulation within 11Alexander and Pulaski counties at least 10 days before the 12date of the hearing.  13    Section 70. Disposition of money; income fund; rental 14moneys; audits. 15    (a) Money received by the Commission from the sale, 16conveyance, or lease of any property, in excess of the amount 17expended by the Commission for authorized purposes under this 18Act, shall be deposited into the Alexander/Pulaski Medical 19District Income Fund, a special fund that is created in the 20State treasury, and may be expended as provided in this 21Section and this Act. 22    (b) The Commission may use all money deposited into the 23Alexander/Pulaski Medical District Income Fund from rentals 24for the purposes of planning, acquisition, and development of 25property within the District, for the operation, maintenance,   SB3647- 17 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1and improvement of property of the Commission, and for all 2purposes and powers set forth in this Act.3    (c) The Auditor General shall conduct audits of the 4Commission in the same manner as the Auditor General conducts 5audits of State agencies under the Illinois State Auditing 6Act. The Auditor General shall, at least biennially, audit or 7cause to be audited all records and accounts of the Commission 8pertaining to the operation of the District.  9    Section 75. Attorney General. The Attorney General is the 10legal advisor to the Commission and shall prosecute or defend, 11as the case may be, all actions brought by or against the 12Commission. 13    Section 900. The Court of Claims Act is amended by 14changing Sections 8, 22-1, and 22-2 as follows: 15    (705 ILCS 505/8)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.8)16    Sec. 8. Court of Claims jurisdiction; deliberation 17periods. The court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear 18and determine the following matters:19        (a) All claims against the State founded upon any law 20    of the State of Illinois or upon any regulation adopted 21    thereunder by an executive or administrative officer or 22    agency; provided, however, the court shall not have 23    jurisdiction (i) to hear or determine claims arising under   SB3647- 18 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1    the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 2    Diseases Act, or claims for expenses in civil litigation, 3    or (ii) to review administrative decisions for which a 4    statute provides that review shall be in the circuit or 5    appellate court.6        (b) All claims against the State founded upon any 7    contract entered into with the State of Illinois.8        (c) All claims against the State for time unjustly 9    served in prisons of this State when the person imprisoned 10    received a pardon from the Governor stating that such 11    pardon is issued on the ground of innocence of the crime 12    for which he or she was imprisoned or he or she received a 13    certificate of innocence from the Circuit Court as 14    provided in Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil Procedure; 15    provided, the amount of the award is at the discretion of 16    the court; and provided, the court shall make no award in 17    excess of the following amounts: for imprisonment of 5 18    years or less, not more than $85,350; for imprisonment of 19    14 years or less but over 5 years, not more than $170,000; 20    for imprisonment of over 14 years, not more than $199,150; 21    and provided further, the court shall fix attorney's fees 22    not to exceed 25% of the award granted. On or after the 23    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General 24    Assembly, the court shall annually adjust the maximum 25    awards authorized by this subsection (c) to reflect the 26    increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index For All   SB3647- 19 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1    Urban Consumers for the previous calendar year, as 2    determined by the United States Department of Labor, 3    except that no annual increment may exceed 5%. For the 4    annual adjustments, if the Consumer Price Index decreases 5    during a calendar year, there shall be no adjustment for 6    that calendar year. The transmission by the Prisoner 7    Review Board or the clerk of the circuit court of the 8    information described in Section 11(b) to the clerk of the 9    Court of Claims is conclusive evidence of the validity of 10    the claim. The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 11    95th General Assembly apply to all claims pending on or 12    filed on or after the effective date. 13        (d) All claims against the State for damages in cases 14    sounding in tort, if a like cause of action would lie 15    against a private person or corporation in a civil suit, 16    and all like claims sounding in tort against the Illinois 17    Medical District Center Commission, the Mid-Illinois 18    Medical District Commission, the Mid-America Medical 19    District Commission, the Roseland Community Medical 20    District Commission, the Alexander/Pulaski Medical 21    District Commission, the Board of Trustees of the 22    University of Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern 23    Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago 24    State University, the Board of Trustees of Eastern 25    Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of Governors 26    State University, the Board of Trustees of Illinois State   SB3647- 20 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1    University, the Board of Trustees of Northeastern Illinois 2    University, the Board of Trustees of Northern Illinois 3    University, the Board of Trustees of Western Illinois 4    University, or the Board of Trustees of the Illinois 5    Mathematics and Science Academy; provided, that an award 6    for damages in a case sounding in tort, other than certain 7    cases involving the operation of a State vehicle described 8    in this paragraph, shall not exceed the sum of $2,000,000 9    to or for the benefit of any claimant. The $2,000,000 10    limit prescribed by this Section does not apply to an 11    award of damages in any case sounding in tort arising out 12    of the operation by a State employee of a vehicle owned, 13    leased or controlled by the State. The defense that the 14    State, or the Illinois Medical District Center Commission, 15    the Mid-Illinois Medical District Commission, the 16    Mid-America Medical District Commission, the Roseland 17    Community Medical District Commission, the 18    Alexander/Pulaski Medical District Commission, or the 19    Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois, the Board 20    of Trustees of Southern Illinois University, the Board of 21    Trustees of Chicago State University, the Board of 22    Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the Board of 23    Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 24    Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of 25    Trustees of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of 26    Trustees of Northern Illinois University, the Board of   SB3647- 21 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1    Trustees of Western Illinois University, or the Board of 2    Trustees of the Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy 3    is not liable for the negligence of its officers, agents, 4    and employees in the course of their employment is not 5    applicable to the hearing and determination of such 6    claims. The changes to this Section made by this 7    amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly apply only to 8    claims filed on or after July 1, 2015.9        The court shall annually adjust the maximum awards 10    authorized by this subsection to reflect the increase, if 11    any, in the Consumer Price Index For All Urban Consumers 12    for the previous calendar year, as determined by the 13    United States Department of Labor. The Comptroller shall 14    make the new amount resulting from each annual adjustment 15    available to the public via the Comptroller's official 16    website by January 31 of every year. 17        (e) All claims for recoupment made by the State of 18    Illinois against any claimant.19        (f) All claims pursuant to the Line of Duty 20    Compensation Act. A claim under that Act must be heard and 21    determined within one year after the application for that 22    claim is filed with the Court as provided in that Act. 23        (g) All claims filed pursuant to the Crime Victims 24    Compensation Act.25        (h) All claims pursuant to the Illinois National 26    Guardsman's Compensation Act. A claim under that Act must   SB3647- 22 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1    be heard and determined within one year after the 2    application for that claim is filed with the Court as 3    provided in that Act. 4        (i) All claims authorized by subsection (a) of Section 5    10-55 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act for the 6    expenses incurred by a party in a contested case on the 7    administrative level.8(Source: P.A. 100-1124, eff. 11-27-18.) 9    (705 ILCS 505/22-1)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.22-1)10    Sec. 22-1. Within 1 year from the date that such an injury 11was received or such a cause of action accrued, any person who 12is about to commence any action in the Court of Claims against 13the State of Illinois, the Illinois Medical District Center 14Commission, the Mid-Illinois Medical District Commission, the 15Mid-America Medical District Commission, the Roseland 16Community Medical District Commission, the Alexander/Pulaski 17Medical District Commission, the Board of Trustees of the 18University of Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern 19Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State 20University, the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois 21University, the Board of Trustees of Governors State 22University, the Board of Trustees of Illinois State 23University, the Board of Trustees of Northeastern Illinois 24University, the Board of Trustees of Northern Illinois 25University, the Board of Trustees of Western Illinois   SB3647- 23 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1University, or the Board of Trustees of the Illinois 2Mathematics and Science Academy, for damages on account of any 3injury to his person shall file in the office of the Attorney 4General and also in the office of the Clerk of the Court of 5Claims, either by himself, his agent, or attorney, giving the 6name of the person to whom the cause of action has accrued, the 7name and residence of the person injured, the date and about 8the hour of the accident, the place or location where the 9accident occurred, a brief description of how the accident 10occurred, and the name and address of the attending physician, 11if any, except as otherwise provided by the Crime Victims 12Compensation Act.13    In actions for death by wrongful act, neglect or default, 14the executor of the estate, or in the event there is no will, 15the administrator or other personal representative of the 16decedent, shall file within 1 year of the date of death or the 17date that the executor or administrator is qualified, 18whichever occurs later, in the office of the Attorney General 19and also in the office of the Clerk of the Court of Claims, 20giving the name of the person to whom the cause of action has 21accrued, the name and last residence of the decedent, the date 22of the accident causing death, the date of the decedent's 23demise, the place or location where the accident causing the 24death occurred, the date and about the hour of the accident, a 25brief description of how the accident occurred, and the names 26and addresses of the attending physician and treating hospital   SB3647- 24 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1if any, except as otherwise provided by the Crime Victims 2Compensation Act.3    A claimant is not required to file the notice required by 4this Section if he or she files his or her claim within one 5year of its accrual.6(Source: P.A. 89-4, eff. 1-1-96; 90-492, eff. 8-17-97.) 7    (705 ILCS 505/22-2)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.22-2)8    Sec. 22-2. If the notice provided for by Section 22-1 is 9not filed as provided in that Section, any such action 10commenced against the State of Illinois, the Illinois Medical 11District Center Commission, the Mid-Illinois Medical District 12Commission, the Mid-America Medical District Commission, the 13Roseland Community Medical District Commission, the 14Alexander/Pulaski Medical District Commission, the Board of 15Trustees of the University of Illinois, the Board of Trustees 16of Southern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of 17Chicago State University, the Board of Trustees of Eastern 18Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of Governors State 19University, the Board of Trustees of Illinois State 20University, the Board of Trustees of Northeastern Illinois 21University, the Board of Trustees of Northern Illinois 22University, the Board of Trustees of Western Illinois 23University, or the Board of Trustees of the Illinois 24Mathematics and Science Academy, shall be dismissed and the 25person to whom any such cause of action accrued for any   SB3647- 25 -LRB104 18645 WRO 32088 b1personal injury shall be forever barred from further action in 2the Court of Claims for such personal injury, except as 3otherwise provided by the Crime Victims Compensation Act.4(Source: P.A. 89-4, eff. 1-1-96.) 5    Section 905. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by changing 6Section 15-5-49 as follows: 7    (735 ILCS 30/15-5-49 new)8    Sec. 15-5-49. Eminent domain powers in new Acts. The 9following provisions of law may include express grants of the 10power to acquire property by condemnation or eminent domain: 11Alexander/Pulaski Medical District Act; medical district; for 12general purposes. 13    Section 910. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 14Section 5.1038 as follows: 15    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)16    Sec. 5.1038. The Alexander/Pulaski Medical District Income 17Fund. 18    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.